src/fst/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
LEXICON NUM_KUUZI !!≈ @CODE@ kuuzi:kuud
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%^D2Z%>i NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-SG-PAR_tu ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e%^WGStem0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@e%^WGStemt NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>ii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
:e%^WGStem ORD_01_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_VIIZI !!≈ @CODE@ viizi:viid
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%^D2Z%>i NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-SG-PAR_ty ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e%^WGStem0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@e%^WGStemt NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>ii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%^D2Z%>i NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
:e%^WGStem ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KYMMENE !!≈ @CODE@ kymmene:kymmen
:%{front%} NUM_KYMMENE_01 ;
LEXICON NUM_KYMMENE_01 !!≈ @CODE@ kymmene:kymmen
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e00 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@000 NUM-SG-PAR_dy ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e00 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Card+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@e00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@et0 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ii0 NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Card+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@i00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
:e%^WGStem ORD_01_FRONT ;

LEXICON NUM_KOLME !!≈ @CODE@ 
+Card:e SGNOMSUF ;
+Card:e SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF ;
+Card:e SGPARSUF_A2 ;

+Card+Sg:e Noun-NB-01 ;
:a ORD_01_BACK ;

LEXICON QNT_
+TYÄ+Qnt: # ;

LEXICON ORD_
+TYÄ+Ord: # ;

LEXICON ORD_TOINE !!≈ @CODE@ toine:to
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@+Ord:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@%{back%}0 NMN_TOINE ;


LEXICON ORD_KARJALAINE !!≈ @CODE@ enzimäine:ensimä
+Ord:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE ;

LEXICON ORD_LIYGILÄINE !!≈ @CODE@ enzimäine:ensimä
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@+Ord:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@%{front%}0 NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE ;

LEXICON ORD_01_BACK
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Ord+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>s0 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Ord+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@t00 NUM-SG-PAR_tu ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Ord+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-SG-GEN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Ord+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Ord+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Ord+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ndet NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Ord+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Ord+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Ord+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Ord+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Ord+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-INS ;

LEXICON ORD_01_FRONT
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Ord+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%>s0 NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Ord+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@t00 NUM-SG-PAR_ty ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Ord+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-SG-GEN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Ord+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@+Ord+Sg:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@nde NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Ord+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ndet NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Ord+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Ord+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Ord+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Ord+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@+Ord+Pl:@U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@nzi NUM-INS ;

LEXICON NUM-USUALLY-WEAK
 NUM-ABE ;
 NUM-ABL ;
 NUM-ADE ;
 NUM-ALL ;
 NUM-ELA ;
 NUM-ESS ;
 NUM-GEN ;
 NUM-INE ;
 NUM-PRL ;
 NUM-TRA ;

LEXICON NUM-USUALLY-STRONG
 NUM-ILL ;
 NUM-TER ;

LEXICON NUM-ABE
@U.DECL-CX.ABE@+Abe:@U.DECL-CX.ABE@%>tt%{aä%}h SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
@U.DECL-CX.ABE@+Abe:@U.DECL-CX.ABE@%>t%{aä%} SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
@U.DECL-CX.ABE@+Abe+Err/Orth:@U.DECL-CX.ABE@%>tt%{aä%} SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ABL
@U.DECL-CX.ABL@+Abl:@U.DECL-CX.ABL@%>lpäi NO-SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
!@U.DECL-CX.ABL@+Abl:@U.DECL-CX.ABL@%>l SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ADE
@U.DECL-CX.ADE@+Ade:@U.DECL-CX.ADE@%>l SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ALL
@U.DECL-CX.ALL@+All:@U.DECL-CX.ALL@%>le SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-SG-GEN
@U.DECL-CX.GEN@+Gen:@U.DECL-CX.GEN@%>n K ;
!@U.DECL-CX.ACC@+Acc:@U.DECL-CX.ACC@%>n K ;
@U.DECL-CX.COM@+Com:@U.DECL-CX.COM@%>nke K ;
@U.DECL-CX.APR@+Apr:@U.DECL-CX.APR@%>ll%{uy%}%{oö%} K ;
@U.DECL-CX.INS@+Ins:@U.DECL-CX.INS@%>n K ;

LEXICON NUM-PL-GEN_EN
@U.DECL-CX.GEN@+Gen:@U.DECL-CX.GEN@%>en SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
@U.DECL-CX.COM@+Com:@U.DECL-CX.COM@%>enke SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
@U.DECL-CX.APR@+Apr:@U.DECL-CX.APR@%>ell%{uy%}%{oö%} SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-PL-GEN_N
@U.DECL-CX.GEN@+Gen:@U.DECL-CX.GEN@%>n SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
@U.DECL-CX.COM@+Com:@U.DECL-CX.COM@%>nke SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
@U.DECL-CX.APR@+Apr:@U.DECL-CX.APR@%>ll%{uy%}%{oö%} SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ELA
@U.DECL-CX.ELA@+Ela:@U.DECL-CX.ELA@%>späi K ;
!@U.DECL-CX.ELA@+Ela:@U.DECL-CX.ELA@%>s SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ESS
@U.DECL-CX.ESS@+Ess:@U.DECL-CX.ESS@%>nn%{uy%} SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-GEN
@U.DECL-CX.GEN@+Gen:@U.DECL-CX.GEN@%>n SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-ILL
@U.DECL-CX.ILL@+Ill:@U.DECL-CX.ILL@%>h SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-INE
@U.DECL-CX.INE@+Ine:@U.DECL-CX.INE@%>s SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-INS
@U.DECL-CX.INS@+Ins:@U.DECL-CX.INS@0 SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-NOM
@U.DECL-CX.NOM@+Nom:@U.DECL-CX.NOM@0 SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-SG-PAR_a
@U.DECL-CX.PAR@+Par:@U.DECL-CX.PAR@%>a SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-SG-PAR_ä
@U.DECL-CX.PAR@+Par:@U.DECL-CX.PAR@%>ä SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-SG-PAR_du
@U.DECL-CX.PAR@+Par:@U.DECL-CX.PAR@%>du SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-SG-PAR_dy
@U.DECL-CX.PAR@+Par:@U.DECL-CX.PAR@%>dy SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;
