src/fst/stems/quantifiers.lexc
kolme+Num:kolm NUM_KOLME  "kolme" ;
kuuzi+Num+Card:kuud NUM_KUUZI  "" ;
kymmene+Num+Card:kymmen NUM_KYMMENE  "" ;
puolitostu+Qnt:puolitostu QNT_  "" ;
puolitostusadua+Qnt:puolitostusadua QNT_  "" ;
viizi+Num+Card:viid NUM_VIIZI  "" ;
